Florida, session 2026, SB540.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 106 107 Section 1.âSection 494.00123, Florida Statutes, is created 108 to read: 109 494.00123âInformation security programs; cybersecurity 110 event investigations.â 111 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 112 (a)ââCustomerâ means a person who seeks to obtain or who 113 obtains or has obtained a financial product or service from a 114 licensee. 115 (b)ââCustomer informationâ means any record containing 116 nonpublic personal information about a customer of a financial 117 transaction, whether on paper, electronic, or in other forms, 118 which is handled or maintained by or on behalf of the licensee 119 or its affiliates. 120 (c)ââCybersecurity eventâ means an event resulting in 121 unauthorized access to, or disruption or misuse of, an 122 information system, information stored on such information 123 system, or customer information held in physical form. 124 (d)ââFinancial product or serviceâ means any product or 125 service offered by a licensee under this chapter. 126 (e)ââInformation security programâ means the 127 administrative, technical, or physical safeguards used to 128 access, collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use, 129 transmit, dispose of, or otherwise handle customer information. 130 (f)ââInformation systemâ means a discrete set of electronic 131 information resources organized for the collection, processing, 132 maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or disposition of 133 electronic information, as well as any specialized system such 134 as an industrial process control system, telephone switching and 135 private branch exchange system, or environmental control system, 136 which contain customer information or which are connected to a 137 system that contains customer information. 138 (g)ââLicenseeâ means a person licensed under this chapter. 139 (h)1.ââNonpublic personal informationâ means: 140 a.âPersonally identifiable financial information; and 141 b.âAny list, description, or other grouping of customers 142 which is derived using any personally identifiable financial 143 information that is not publicly available, such as account 144 numbers, including any list of individualsâ names and street 145 addresses which is derived, in whole or in part, using 146 personally identifiable financial information that is not 147 publicly available. 148 2.âThe term does not include: 149 a.âPublicly available information, except as included on a 150 list, description, or other grouping of customers described in 151 sub-subparagraph 1.b.; 152 b.âAny list, description, or other grouping of consumers, 153 or any publicly available information pertaining to such list, 154 description, or other grouping of consumers, which is derived 155 without using any personally identifiable financial information 156 that is not publicly available; or 157 c.âAny list of individualsâ names and addresses which 158 contains only publicly available information, is not derived, in 159 whole or in part, using personally identifiable financial 160 information that is not publicly available, and is not disclosed 161 in a manner that indicates that any of the individuals on the 162 list is a customer of a licensee. 163 3.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 164 a.(I)ââPersonally identifiable financial informationâ means 165 any information that: 166 (A)âA customer provides to a licensee to obtain a financial 167 product or service, such as information that a customer provides 168 to a licensee on an application to obtain a loan or other 169 financial product or service; 170 (B)âA licensee receives about a consumer which is obtained 171 during or as a result of any transaction involving a financial 172 product or service between the licensee and the customer, such 173 as information collected through an information-collecting 174 device from a web server; or 175 (C)âA licensee otherwise obtains about a customer in 176 connection with providing a financial product or service to the 177 customer, such as the fact that an individual is or has been one 178 of the licenseeâs customers or has obtained a financial product 179 or service from the licensee. 180 (II)âThe term âpersonally identifiable financial 181 informationâ does not include: 182 (A)âA list of names and addresses of customers of an entity 183 that is not a financial institution; or 184 (B)âInformation that does not identify a customer, such as 185 blind data or aggregate information that does not contain 186 personal identifiers such as account numbers, names, or 187 addresses. 188 b.(I)ââPublicly available informationâ means any 189 information that a licensee has a reasonable basis to believe is 190 lawfully made available to the general public from: 191 (A)âFederal, state, or local government records, such as 192 government real estate records or security interest filings; 193 (B)âWidely distributed media, such as information from a 194 telephone records repository or directory, a television or radio 195 program, a newspaper, a social media platform, or a website that 196 is available to the general public on an unrestricted basis. A 197 website is not restricted merely because an Internet service 198 provider or a site operator requires a fee or a password, so 199 long as access is available to the general public; or 200 (C)âDisclosures to the general public which are required to 201 be made by federal, state, or local law. 202 (II)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term âreasonable 203 basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general 204 publicâ relating to any information means that the person has 205 taken steps to determine: 206 (A)âThat the information is of the type that is available 207 to the general public, such as information included on the 208 public record in the jurisdiction where the mortgage would be 209 recorded; and 210 (B)âWhether an individual can direct that the information 211 not be made available to the general public and, if so, the 212 customer to whom the information relates has not done so, such 213 as when a telephone number is listed in a telephone directory 214 and the customer has informed the licensee that the telephone 215 number is not unlisted. 216 (i)ââThird-party service providerâ means a person, other 217 than a licensee, which contracts with a licensee to maintain, 218 process, or store nonpublic personal information, or is 219 otherwise permitted access to nonpublic personal information 220 through its provision of services to a licensee. 221 (2)âINFORMATION SECURITY PROGRAM.â 222 (a)âEach licensee shall develop, implement, and maintain a 223 comprehensive written information security program that contains 224 administrative, technical, and physical safeguards for the 225 protection of the licenseeâs information system and nonpublic 226 personal information. 227 (b)âEach licensee shall ensure that the information 228 security program meets all of the following criteria: 229 1.âBe commensurate with the following measures: 230 a.âSize and complexity of the licensee. 231 b.âNature and scope of the licenseeâs activities, including 232 the licenseeâs use of third-party service providers. 233 c.âSensitivity of nonpublic personal information that is 234 used by the licensee or that is in the licenseeâs possession, 235 custody, or control. 236 2.âBe designed to do all of the following: 237 a.âProtect the security and confidentiality of nonpublic 238 personal information and the security of the licenseeâs 239 information system. 240 b.âProtect against threats or hazards to the security or 241 integrity of nonpublic personal information and the licenseeâs 242 information system. 243 c.âProtect against unauthorized access to or the use of 244 nonpublic personal information and minimize the likelihood of 245 harm to any customer. 246 3.âDefine and periodically reevaluate the retention 247 schedule and the mechanism for the destruction of nonpublic 248 personal information if retention is no longer necessary for the 249 licenseeâs business operations or is no longer required by 250 applicable law. 251 4.âRegularly test and monitor systems and procedures for 252 the detection of actual and attempted attacks on, or intrusions 253 into, the licenseeâs information system. 254 5.âBe monitored, evaluated, and adjusted, as necessary, to 255 meet all of the following requirements: 256 a.âDetermine whether the licenseeâs information security 257 program is consistent with relevant changes in technology. 258 b.âConfirm the licenseeâs information security program 259 accounts for the sensitivity of nonpublic personal information. 260 c.âIdentify changes that may be necessary to the licenseeâs 261 information system. 262 d.âEliminate any internal or external threats to nonpublic 263 personal information. 264 e.âAmend the licenseeâs information security program for 265 any of the licenseeâs changing business arrangements, including, 266 but not limited to, mergers and acquisitions, alliances and 267 joint ventures, and outsourcing arrangements. 268 (c)1.âAs part of a licenseeâs information security program, 269 the licensee shall establish a written incident response plan 270 designed to promptly respond to, and recover from, a 271 cybersecurity event that compromises: 272 a.âThe confidentiality, integrity, or availability of 273 nonpublic personal information in the licenseeâs possession; 274 b.âThe licenseeâs information system; or 275 c.âThe continuing functionality of any aspect of the 276 licenseeâs operations. 277 2.âThe written incident response plan must address all of 278 the following: 279 a.âThe licenseeâs internal process for responding to a 280 cybersecurity event. 281 b.âThe goals of the licenseeâs incident response plan. 282 c.âThe assignment of clear roles, responsibilities, and 283 levels of decisionmaking authority for the licenseeâs personnel 284 that participate in the incident response plan. 285 d.âExternal communications, internal communications, and 286 information sharing related to a cybersecurity event. 287 e.âThe identification of remediation requirements for 288 weaknesses identified in information systems and associated 289 controls. 290 f.âThe documentation and reporting regarding cybersecurity 291 events and related incident response activities. 292 g.âThe evaluation and revision of the incident response 293 plan, as appropriate, following a cybersecurity event. 294 h.âThe process by which notice must be given as required 295 under subsection (4) and s. 501.171(3) and (4). 296 (d)1.âThis section does not apply to a licensee that has 297 fewer than: 298 a.âTwenty individuals on its workforce, including employees 299 and independent contractors; or 300 b.âFive hundred customers during a calendar year. 301 2.âA licensee that no longer qualifies for exemption under 302 subparagraph 1. has 180 calendar days to comply with this 303 section after the date of the disqualification. 304 (e)âEach licensee shall maintain a copy of the information 305 security program for a minimum of 5 years and shall make it 306 available to the office upon request or as part of an 307 examination. 308 (3)âCYBERSECURITY EVENT INVESTIGATION.â 309 (a)âIf a licensee discovers that a cybersecurity event has 310 occurred or that a cybersecurity event may have occurred, the 311 licensee, or an outside vendor or third-party service provider 312 that the licensee has designated to act on its behalf, shall 313 conduct a prompt investigation of the cybersecurity event. 314 (b)âDuring the investigation, the licensee, or the outside 315 vendor or third-party service provider that the licensee has 316 designated to act on its behalf, shall, at a minimum, determine 317 as much of the following as possible: 318 1.âConfirm that a cybersecurity event has occurred. 319 2.âIdentify the date that the cybersecurity event first 320 occurred. 321 3.âAssess the nature and scope of the cybersecurity event. 322 4.âIdentify all nonpublic personal information that may 323 have been compromised by the cybersecurity event. 324 5.âPerform or oversee reasonable measures to restore the 325 security of any compromised information system in order to 326 prevent further unauthorized acquisition, release, or use of 327 nonpublic personal information that is in the licenseeâs, 328 outside vendorâs, or third-party service providerâs possession, 329 custody, or control. 330 (c)âIf a licensee learns that a cybersecurity event has 331 occurred, or may have occurred, in an information system 332 maintained by a third-party service provider of the licensee, 333 the licensee shall complete an investigation in compliance with 334 this section or confirm and document that the third-party 335 service provider has completed an investigation in compliance 336 with this section. 337 (d)âA licensee shall maintain all records and documentation 338 related to the licenseeâs investigation of a cybersecurity event 339 for a minimum of 5 years after the date of the cybersecurity 340 event and shall produce the records and documentation to the 341 office upon request. 342 (4)âNOTICE TO OFFICE OF SECURITY BREACH.â 343 (a)âEach licensee shall provide notice to the office of any 344 breach of security affecting 500 or more individuals in this 345 state at a time and in the manner prescribed by commission rule. 346 (b)âEach licensee shall, upon the officeâs request, provide 347 a quarterly update of a cybersecurity event investigation under 348 subsection (3) until conclusion of the investigation. 349 (5)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section may not be construed to 350 relieve a covered entity from complying with s. 501.171. To the 351 extent a licensee is a covered entity, as defined in s. 352 501.171(1), the licensee remains subject to s. 501.171. 353 (6)âRULES.âThe commission may adopt rules to administer 354 this section, including rules that allow a licensee that is in 355 full compliance with the Federal Trade Commissionâs Standards 356 for Safeguarding Customer Information, 16 C.F.R. part 314, to be 357 deemed in compliance with subsection (2). 358 Section 2.âParagraph (z) is added to subsection (1) of 359 section 494.00255, Florida Statutes, to read: 360 494.00255âAdministrative penalties and fines; license 361 violations.â 362 (1)âEach of the following acts constitutes a ground for 363 which the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (2) may 364 be taken against a person licensed or required to be licensed 365 under part II or part III of this chapter: 366 (z)âFailure to comply with the notification requirements in 367 s. 501.171(3) and (4). 368 Section 3.âPresent subsections (28) through (36) of section 369 517.021, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (29) 370 through (37), respectively, a new subsection (28) is added to 371 that section, and subsection (20) of that section is amended, to 372 read: 373 517.021âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 374 context otherwise indicates, the following terms have the 375 following respective meanings: 376 (20)(a)ââInvestment adviserâ means a person, other than an 377 associated person of an investment adviser or a federal covered 378 adviser, that receives compensation, directly or indirectly, and 379 engages for all or part of the personâs time, directly or 380 indirectly, or through publications or writings, in the business 381 of advising others as to the value of securities or as to the 382 advisability of investments in, purchasing of, or selling of 383 securities. 384 (b)âThe term does not include any of the following: 385 1.âA dealer or an associated person of a dealer whose 386 performance of services in paragraph (a) is solely incidental to 387 the conduct of the dealerâs or associated personâs business as a 388 dealer and who does not receive special compensation for those 389 services. 390 2.âA licensed practicing attorney or certified public 391 accountant whose performance of such services is solely 392 incidental to the practice of the attorneyâs or accountantâs 393 profession. 394 3.âA bank authorized to do business in this state. 395 4.âA bank holding company as defined in the Bank Holding 396 Company Act of 1956, as amended, authorized to do business in 397 this state. 398 5.âA trust company having trust powers, as defined in s. 399 658.12, which it is authorized to exercise in this state, which 400 trust company renders or performs investment advisory services 401 in a fiduciary capacity incidental to the exercise of its trust 402 powers. 403 6.âA person that renders investment advice exclusively to 404 insurance or investment companies. 405 7.âA person: 406 a.âWithout a place of business in this state if the person 407 has had that, during the preceding 12 months, has fewer than six 408 clients who are residents of this state. 409 b.âWith a place of business in this state if the person has 410 had, during the preceding 12 months, fewer than six clients who 411 are residents of this state and no clients who are not residents 412 of this state. 413 414 As used in this subparagraph, the term âclientâ has the same 415 meaning as provided in Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 416 222-2 275.222-2, 17 C.F.R. s. 275.222-2, as amended. 417 8.âA federal covered adviser. 418 9.âThe United States, a state, or any political subdivision 419 of a state, or any agency, authority, or instrumentality of any 420 such entity; a business entity that is wholly owned directly or 421 indirectly by such a governmental entity; or any officer, agent, 422 or employee of any such governmental or business entity who is 423 acting within the scope of his or her official duties. 424 10.âA family office as defined in Securities and Exchange 425 Commission Rule 202(a)(11)(G)-1(b) and (d) under the Investment 426 Advisers Act of 1940, 17 C.F.R. s. 275. 202(a)(11)(G)-1(b) and 427 (d), as amended, without giving regard to paragraph 1(a) or 428 paragraph 1(c) of that rule. 429 (28)ââPlace of businessâ of an investment adviser means an 430 office at which the investment adviser regularly provides 431 investment advisory services to, solicits, meets with, or 432 otherwise communicates with clients; and any other location that 433 is held out to the general public as a location at which the 434 investment adviser provides investment advisory services to, 435 solicits, meets with, or otherwise communicates with clients. 436 Section 4.âSection 559.952, Florida Statutes, is amended to 437 read: 438 559.952âFinancial Technology Sandbox.â 439 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the 440 âFinancial Technology Sandbox.â 441 (2)âCREATION OF THE FINANCIAL TECHNOLOGY SANDBOX.âThere is 442 created the Financial Technology Sandbox within the Office of 443 Financial Regulation to allow financial technology innovators to 444 test new products and services in a supervised, flexible 445 regulatory sandbox using exceptions to specified general law and 446 waivers of specified provisions of general law and the 447 corresponding rule requirements under defined conditions. The 448 creation of a supervised, flexible regulatory sandbox provides a 449 welcoming business environment for technology innovators and may 450 lead to significant business growth. 451 (3)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 452 (a)ââBusiness entityâ means any corporation, limited 453 liability company, or trust that may or may not be fictitiously 454 named and that does business in this state a domestic 455 corporation or other organized domestic entity with a physical 456 presence, other than that of a registered office or agent or 457 virtual mailbox, in this state. 458 (b)ââCommissionâ means the Financial Services Commission. 459 (c)ââConsumerâ means a person in this state, whether a 460 natural person or a business organization, who purchases, uses, 461 receives, or enters into an agreement to purchase, use, or 462 receive a an innovative financial product or service made 463 available through the Financial Technology Sandbox. 464 (d)ââControl personâ means an individual, a partnership, a 465 corporation, a trust, or other organization that possesses the 466 power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or 467 policies of a company, whether through ownership of securities, 468 by contract, or through other means. A person is presumed to 469 control a company if, with respect to a particular company, that 470 person: 471 1.âIs a director, a general partner, or an officer 472 exercising executive responsibility or having similar status or 473 functions; 474 2.âDirectly or indirectly may vote 10 percent or more of a 475 class of a voting security or sell or direct the sale of 10 476 percent or more of a class of voting securities; or 477 3.âIn the case of a partnership, may receive upon 478 dissolution or has contributed 10 percent or more of the 479 capital. 480 (e)ââCorresponding rule requirementsâ means the commission 481 rules, or portions thereof, which implement the general laws 482 enumerated in paragraph (4)(a). 483 (f)ââFinancial product or serviceâ means a product or 484 service related to a consumer finance loan, as defined in s. 485 516.01, or credit, banking services, money transmission, or 486 securities transactions a money transmitter or payment 487 instrument seller, as those terms are defined in s. 560.103, 488 including mediums of exchange that are in electronic or digital 489 form, which is subject to the general laws enumerated in 490 paragraph (4)(a) and corresponding rule requirements and which 491 is under the jurisdiction of the office. 492 (g)ââFinancial Technology Sandboxâ means the program 493 created by this section which allows a licensee to make a an 494 innovative financial product or service available to consumers 495 during a sandbox period through waivers of exceptions to general 496 laws and waivers of corresponding rule requirements. 497 (h)ââInnovativeâ means new or emerging technology, or new 498 uses of existing technology, which provide a product, service, 499 business model, or delivery mechanism to the public and which 500 are not known to have a comparable offering in this state 501 outside the Financial Technology Sandbox. 502 (h)(i)ââLicenseeâ means a business entity that has been 503 approved by the office to participate in the Financial 504 Technology Sandbox. 505 (i)(j)ââOfficeâ means, unless the context clearly indicates 506 otherwise, the Office of Financial Regulation. 507 (j)(k)ââSandbox periodâ means the initial 24-month period 508 in which the office has authorized a licensee to make a an 509 innovative financial product or service available to consumers, 510 and any extension granted pursuant to subsection (7). 511 (4)âWAIVERS OF EXCEPTIONS TO GENERAL LAW AND CORRESPONDING 512 WAIVERS OF RULE REQUIREMENTS.â 513 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law, upon approval of a 514 Financial Technology Sandbox application, the office may grant 515 an applicant during a sandbox period a waiver of a requirement, 516 or a portion thereof, imposed by a general law or rule in any 517 following chapter, or part thereof, if all of the conditions in 518 paragraph (b) are met following provisions and corresponding 519 rule requirements are not applicable to the licensee during the 520 sandbox period: 521 1.âChapter 516, Consumer Finance. 522 2.âChapter 517, Securities Transactions. 523 3.âChapter 520, Retail Installment Sales. 524 4.âChapter 537, Title Loans. 525 5.âPart I or part II of chapter 560, General Provisions of 526 Money Services Businesses or Payment Instruments and Funds 527 Transmission. 528 6.âChapter 655, Financial Institutions Generally. 529 7.âChapter 657, Credit Unions. 530 8.âChapter 658, Banks and Trust Companies. 531 9.âChapter 660, Trust Business. 532 10.âChapter 662, Family Trust Companies. 533 11.âChapter 663, International Banking. 534 1.âSection 516.03(1), except for the application fee, the 535 investigation fee, the requirement to provide the social 536 security numbers of control persons, evidence of liquid assets 537 of at least $25,000 or documents satisfying the requirements of 538 s. 516.05(10), and the officeâs authority to investigate the 539 applicantâs background. The office may prorate the license 540 renewal fee for an extension granted under subsection (7). 541 2.âSection 516.05(1) and (2), except that the office shall 542 investigate the applicantâs background. 543 3.âSection 560.109, only to the extent that the section 544 requires the office to examine a licensee at least once every 5 545 years. 546 4.âSection 560.118(2). 547 5.âSection 560.125(1), only to the extent that the 548 subsection would prohibit a licensee from engaging in the 549 business of a money transmitter or payment instrument seller 550 during the sandbox period. 551 6.âSection 560.125(2), only to the extent that the 552 subsection would prohibit a licensee from appointing an 553 authorized vendor during the sandbox period. Any authorized 554 vendor of such a licensee during the sandbox period remains 555 liable to the holder or remitter. 556 7.âSection 560.128. 557 8.âSection 560.141, except for s. 560.141(1)(a)1., 3., 7. 558 10. and (b), (c), and (d). 559 9.âSection 560.142(1) and (2), except that the office may 560 prorate, but may not entirely eliminate, the license renewal 561 fees in s. 560.143 for an extension granted under subsection 562 (7). 563 10.âSection 560.143(2), only to the extent necessary for 564 proration of the renewal fee under subparagraph 9. 565 11.âSection 560.204(1), only to the extent that the 566 subsection would prohibit a licensee from engaging in, or 567 advertising that it engages in, the activity of a payment 568 instrument seller or money transmitter during the sandbox 569 period. 570 12.âSection 560.205(2). 571 13.âSection 560.208(2). 572 14.âSection 560.209, only to the extent that the office may 573 modify, but may not entirely eliminate, the net worth, corporate 574 surety bond, and collateral deposit amounts required under that 575 section. The modified amounts must be in such lower amounts that 576 the office determines to be commensurate with the factors under 577 paragraph (5)(c) and the maximum number of consumers authorized 578 to receive the financial product or service under this section. 579 (b)âThe office may grant an applicant during a sandbox 580 period a waiver of a requirement, or a portion thereof, imposed 581 by a general law or rule in any chapter enumerated in paragraph 582 (a) if all of the following conditions are met: approve a 583 Financial Technology Sandbox application if one or more of the 584 general laws enumerated in paragraph (a) currently prevent the 585 innovative financial product or service from being made 586 available to consumers and if all other requirements of this 587 section are met. 588 1.âThe general law or rule does not currently authorize the 589 financial product or service to be made available to consumers. 590 2.âThe waiver is not broader than necessary to accomplish 591 the purposes and standards specified in this section, as 592 determined by the office. 593 3.âAny provision relating to the liability of an 594 incorporator, director, or officer of the applicant is not 595 eligible for a waiver. 596 (c)âA licensee may conduct business through electronic 597 means, including through the Internet or a software application. 598 (5)âFINANCIAL TECHNOLOGY SANDBOX APPLICATION; STANDARDS FOR 599 APPROVAL.â 600 (a)âBefore filing an application for licensure under this 601 section, a substantially affected person may seek a declaratory 602 statement pursuant to s. 120.565 regarding the applicability of 603 a statute, a rule, or an agency order to the petitionerâs 604 particular set of circumstances or a variance or waiver of a 605 rule pursuant to s. 120.542. 606 (b)âBefore making a an innovative financial product or 607 service available to consumers in the Financial Technology 608 Sandbox, a business entity must file with the office an 609 application for licensure under the Financial Technology 610 Sandbox. The commission shall, by rule, prescribe the form and 611 manner of the application and how the office will evaluate and 612 apply each of the factors specified in paragraph (c). 613 1.âThe application must specify each general law enumerated 614 in paragraph (4)(a) which currently prevents the innovative 615 financial product or service from being made available to 616 consumers and the reasons why those provisions of general law 617 prevent the innovative financial product or service from being 618 made available to consumers. 619 2.âThe application must contain sufficient information for 620 the office to evaluate the factors specified in paragraph (c). 621 3.âAn application submitted on behalf of a business entity 622 must include evidence that the business entity has authorized 623 the person to submit the application on behalf of the business 624 entity intending to make a an innovative financial product or 625 service available to consumers. 626 4.âThe application must specify the maximum number of 627 consumers, which may not exceed the number of consumers 628 specified in paragraph (f), to whom the applicant proposes to 629 provide the innovative financial product or service. 630 5.âThe application must include a proposed draft of the 631 statement or statements meeting the requirements of paragraph 632 (6)(b) which the applicant proposes to provide to consumers. 633 (c)âThe office shall approve or deny in writing a Financial 634 Technology Sandbox application within 60 days after receiving 635 the completed application. The office and the applicant may 636 jointly agree to extend the time beyond 60 days. Consistent with 637 this section, the office may impose conditions on any approval. 638 In deciding whether to approve or deny an application for 639 licensure, the office must consider each of the following: 640 1.âThe nature of the innovative financial product or 641 service proposed to be made available to consumers in the 642 Financial Technology Sandbox, including all relevant technical 643 details. 644 2.âThe potential risk to consumers and the methods that 645 will be used to protect consumers and resolve complaints during 646 the sandbox period. 647 2.3.âThe business plan proposed by the applicant, including 648 company information, market analysis, and financial projections 649 or pro forma financial statements, and evidence of the financial 650 viability of the applicant. 651 4.âWhether the applicant has the necessary personnel, 652 adequate financial and technical expertise, and a sufficient 653 plan to test, monitor, and assess the innovative financial 654 product or service. 655 3.5.âWhether any control person of the applicant, 656 regardless of adjudication, has pled no contest to, has been 657 convicted or found guilty of, or is currently under 658 investigation for fraud, a state or federal securities 659 violation, a property-based offense, or a crime involving moral 660 turpitude or dishonest dealing, in which case the application to 661 the Financial Technology Sandbox must be denied. 662 4.6.âA copy of the disclosures that will be provided to 663 consumers under paragraph (6)(b). 664 5.7.âThe financial responsibility of the applicant and any 665 control person, including whether the applicant or any control 666 person has a history of unpaid liens, unpaid judgments, or other 667 general history of nonpayment of legal debts, including, but not 668 limited to, having been the subject of a petition for bankruptcy 669 under the United States Bankruptcy Code within the past 7 670 calendar years. 671 6.8.âAny other factor that the office determines to be 672 relevant. 673 (d)âThe office may not approve an application if: 674 1.âThe applicant had a prior Financial Technology Sandbox 675 application that was approved and that related to a 676 substantially similar financial product or service; 677 2.âAny control person of the applicant was substantially 678 involved in the development, operation, or management with 679 another Financial Technology Sandbox applicant whose application 680 was approved and whose application related to a substantially 681 similar financial product or service; or 682 3.âThe applicant or any control person has failed to 683 affirmatively demonstrate financial responsibility. 684 (e)âUpon approval of an application, the office shall 685 notify the licensee of the specific that the licensee is exempt 686 from the provisions of general law enumerated in paragraph 687 (4)(a) and the corresponding rule requirements that are waived 688 during the sandbox period. The office shall post on its website 689 notice of the approval of the application, a summary of the 690 innovative financial product or service, and the contact 691 information of the licensee. 692 (f)âThe office, on a case-by-case basis, may shall specify 693 the maximum number of consumers authorized to receive a an 694 innovative financial product or service, after consultation with 695 the Financial Technology Sandbox applicant. The office may not 696 authorize more than 15,000 consumers to receive the financial 697 product or service until the licensee has filed the first report 698 required under subsection (8). After the filing of that report, 699 if the licensee demonstrates adequate financial capitalization, 700 risk management processes, and management oversight, the office 701 may authorize up to 25,000 consumers to receive the financial 702 product or service. 703 (g)âA licensee has a continuing obligation to promptly 704 inform the office of any material change to the information 705 provided under paragraph (b). 706 (h)âThe following information provided to and held by the 707 office in a Financial Technology Sandbox application under this 708 subsection is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 709 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 710 1.âThe reasons why a general law enumerated in paragraph 711 (4)(a) prevents the innovative financial product or service from 712 being made available to consumers. 713 2.âThe information provided for evaluation of the factors 714 specified in subparagraphs (c)1. and 2. 3. 715 3.âThe information provided for evaluation of whether the 716 applicant has a sufficient plan to test, monitor, and assess the 717 innovative financial product or service, under subparagraph 718 (c)4. 719 720 However, the confidential and exempt information may be released 721 to appropriate state and federal agencies for the purposes of 722 investigation. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 723 prevent the office from disclosing a summary of the innovative 724 financial product or service. 725 (6)âOPERATION OF THE FINANCIAL TECHNOLOGY SANDBOX.â 726 (a)âA licensee may make a an innovative financial product 727 or service available to consumers during the sandbox period. 728 (b)1.âBefore a consumer purchases, uses, receives, or 729 enters into an agreement to purchase, use, or receive a an 730 innovative financial product or service through the Financial 731 Technology Sandbox, the licensee must provide a written 732 statement of all of the following to the consumer: 733 a.âThe name and contact information of the licensee. 734 b.âThat the financial product or service has been 735 authorized to be made available to consumers for a temporary 736 period by the office, under the laws of this state. 737 c.âThat the state does not endorse the financial product or 738 service. 739 d.âThat the financial product or service is undergoing 740 testing, may not function as intended, and may entail financial 741 risk. 742 e.âThat the licensee is not immune from civil liability for 743 any losses or damages caused by the financial product or 744 service. 745 f.âThe expected end date of the sandbox period. 746 g.âThe contact information for the office and notification 747 that suspected legal violations, complaints, or other comments 748 related to the financial product or service may be submitted to 749 the office. 750 h.âAny other statements or disclosures required by rule of 751 the commission which are necessary to further the purposes of 752 this section. 753 2.âThe written statement under subparagraph 1. must contain 754 an acknowledgment from the consumer, which must be retained for 755 the duration of the sandbox period by the licensee. 756 (c)âThe office may enter into an agreement with a state, 757 federal, or foreign regulatory agency to allow licensees under 758 the Financial Technology Sandbox to make their products or 759 services available in other jurisdictions. The commission shall 760 adopt rules to implement this paragraph. 761 (d)âThe office may examine the records of a licensee at any 762 time, with or without prior notice. 763 (7)âEXTENSION AND CONCLUSION OF SANDBOX PERIOD.â 764 (a)âA licensee may apply for one extension of the initial 765 24-month sandbox period for 12 additional months for a purpose 766 specified in subparagraph (b)1. or subparagraph (b)2. A complete 767 application for an extension must be filed with the office at 768 least 90 days before the conclusion of the initial sandbox 769 period. The office shall approve or deny the application for 770 extension in writing at least 35 days before the conclusion of 771 the initial sandbox period. In determining whether to approve or 772 deny an application for extension of the sandbox period, the 773 office must, at a minimum, consider the current status of the 774 factors previously considered under paragraph (5)(c). 775 (b)âAn application for an extension under paragraph (a) 776 must cite one of the following reasons as the basis for the 777 application and must provide all relevant supporting 778 information: 779 1.âAmendments to general law or rules are necessary to 780 offer the innovative financial product or service in this state 781 permanently. 782 2.âAn application for a license that is required in order 783 to offer the innovative financial product or service in this 784 state permanently has been filed with the office and approval is 785 pending. 786 (c)âAt least 30 days before the conclusion of the initial 787 24-month sandbox period or the extension, whichever is later, a 788 licensee shall provide written notification to consumers 789 regarding the conclusion of the initial sandbox period or the 790 extension and may not make the financial product or service 791 available to any new consumers after the conclusion of the 792 initial sandbox period or the extension, whichever is later, 793 until legal authority outside of the Financial Technology 794 Sandbox exists for the licensee to make the financial product or 795 service available to consumers. After the conclusion of the 796 sandbox period or the extension, whichever is later, the 797 business entity formerly licensed under the Financial Technology 798 Sandbox may: 799 1.âCollect and receive money owed to the business entity or 800 pay money owed by the business entity, based on agreements with 801 consumers made before the conclusion of the sandbox period or 802 the extension. 803 2.âTake necessary legal action. 804 3.âTake other actions authorized by commission rule which 805 are not inconsistent with this section. 806 (8)âREPORT.âA licensee shall submit a report to the office 807 twice a year as prescribed by commission rule. The report must, 808 at a minimum, include financial reports and the number of 809 consumers who have received the financial product or service. 810 (9)âCONSTRUCTION.âA business entity whose Financial 811 Technology Sandbox application is approved under this section: 812 (a)âShall be deemed to possess an appropriate license under 813 any general law requiring state licensure or authorization. 814 (b)âDoes not obtain a property right. 815 (c)âIs not, nor is its financial product or service, 816 endorsed by this state, nor is this state subject to liability 817 for losses or damages caused by the financial product or 818 service. 819 (a)âIs licensed under chapter 516, chapter 560, or both 820 chapters 516 and 560, as applicable to the business entityâs 821 activities. 822 (b)âIs subject to any provision of chapter 516 or chapter 823 560 not specifically excepted under paragraph (4)(a), as 824 applicable to the business entityâs activities, and must comply 825 with such provisions. 826 (c)âMay not engage in activities authorized under part III 827 of chapter 560, notwithstanding s. 560.204(2). 828 (10)âVIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES.â 829 (a)âA licensee who makes a an innovative financial product 830 or service available to consumers in the Financial Technology 831 Sandbox remains subject to: 832 1.âCivil damages for acts and omissions arising from or 833 related to any innovative financial product or services provided 834 or made available by the licensee or relating to this section. 835 2.âAll criminal and consumer protection laws and any other 836 statute not specifically excepted under paragraph (4)(a). 837 (b)1.âThe office may, by order, revoke or suspend a 838 licenseeâs approval to participate in the Financial Technology 839 Sandbox if: 840 a.âThe licensee has violated or refused to comply with this 841 section, any statute not specifically excepted under paragraph 842 (4)(a), a rule of the commission that has not been waived, an 843 order of the office, or a condition placed by the office on the 844 approval of the licenseeâs Financial Technology Sandbox 845 application; 846 b.âA fact or condition exists that, if it had existed or 847 become known at the time that the Financial Technology Sandbox 848 application was pending, would have warranted denial of the 849 application or the imposition of material conditions; 850 c.âA material error, false statement, misrepresentation, or 851 material omission was made in the Financial Technology Sandbox 852 application; or 853 d.âAfter consultation with the licensee, the office 854 determines that continued testing of the innovative financial 855 product or service would: 856 (I)âBe likely to harm consumers; or 857 (II)âNo longer serve the purposes of this section because 858 of the financial or operational failure of the financial product 859 or service. 860 2.âWritten notice of a revocation or suspension order made 861 under subparagraph 1. must be served using any means authorized 862 by law. If the notice relates to a suspension, the notice must 863 include any condition or remedial action that the licensee must 864 complete before the office lifts the suspension. 865 (c)âThe office may refer any suspected violation of law to 866 an appropriate state or federal agency for investigation, 867 prosecution, civil penalties, and other appropriate enforcement 868 action. 869 (d)âIf service of process on a licensee is not feasible, 870 service on the office is deemed service on the licensee. 871 (11)âRULES AND ORDERS.â 872 (a)âThe commission shall adopt rules to administer this 873 section before approving any application under this section. 874 (b)âThe office may issue all necessary orders to enforce 875 this section and may enforce these orders in accordance with 876 chapter 120 or in any court of competent jurisdiction. These 877 orders include, but are not limited to, orders for payment of 878 restitution for harm suffered by consumers as a result of a an 879 innovative financial product or service. 880 Section 5.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 560.114, 881 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 882 560.114âDisciplinary actions; penalties.â 883 (1)âThe following actions by a money services business, an 884 authorized vendor, or a affiliated party that was affiliated at 885 the time of commission of the actions constitute grounds for the 886 issuance of a cease and desist order; the issuance of a removal 887 order; the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license; or 888 taking any other action within the authority of the office 889 pursuant to this chapter: 890 (a)âFailure to comply with any provision of this chapter or 891 related rule or order, or any written agreement entered into 892 with the office. 893 (b)âFraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or gross negligence 894 in any transaction by a money services business, regardless of 895 reliance thereon by, or damage to, a customer. 896 (c)âFraudulent misrepresentation, circumvention, or 897 concealment of any matter that must be stated or furnished to a 898 customer pursuant to this chapter, regardless of reliance 899 thereon by, or damage to, such customer. 900 (d)âFalse, deceptive, or misleading advertising. 901 (e)âFailure to maintain, preserve, keep available for 902 examination, and produce all books, accounts, files, or other 903 documents required by this chapter or related rules or orders, 904 by 31 C.F.R. ss. 1010.306, 1010.311, 1010.312, 1010.340, 905 1010.410, 1010.415, 1022.210, 1022.320, 1022.380, and 1022.410, 906 or by an agreement entered into with the office. 907 (f)âRefusing to allow the examination or inspection of 908 books, accounts, files, or other documents by the office 909 pursuant to this chapter, or to comply with a subpoena issued by 910 the office. 911 (g)âFailure to pay a judgment recovered in any court by a 912 claimant in an action arising out of a money transmission 913 transaction within 30 days after the judgment becomes final. 914 (h)âEngaging in an act prohibited under s. 560.111 or s. 915 560.1115. 916 (i)âInsolvency. 917 (j)âFailure by a money services business to remove an 918 affiliated party after the office has issued and served upon the 919 money services business a final order setting forth a finding 920 that the affiliated party has violated a provision of this 921 chapter. 922 (k)âMaking a material misstatement, misrepresentation, or 923 omission in an application for licensure, any amendment to such 924 application, or application for the appointment of an authorized 925 vendor. 926 (l)âCommitting any act that results in a license or its 927 equivalent, to practice any profession or occupation being 928 denied, suspended, revoked, or otherwise acted against by a 929 licensing authority in any jurisdiction. 930 (m)âBeing the subject of final agency action or its 931 equivalent, issued by an appropriate regulator, for engaging in 932 unlicensed activity as a money services business or deferred 933 presentment provider in any jurisdiction. 934 (n)âCommitting any act resulting in a license or its 935 equivalent to practice any profession or occupation being 936 denied, suspended, revoked, or otherwise acted against by a 937 licensing authority in any jurisdiction for a violation of 18 938 U.S.C. s. 1956, 18 U.S.C. s. 1957, 18 U.S.C. s. 1960, 31 U.S.C. 939 s. 5324, or any other law or rule of another state or of the 940 United States relating to a money services business, deferred 941 presentment provider, or usury that may cause the denial, 942 suspension, or revocation of a money services business or 943 deferred presentment provider license or its equivalent in such 944 jurisdiction. 945 (o)âHaving been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty 946 or nolo contendere to, any felony or crime punishable by 947 imprisonment of 1 year or more under the law of any state or the 948 United States which involves fraud, moral turpitude, or 949 dishonest dealing, regardless of adjudication. 950 (p)âHaving been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty 951 or nolo contendere to, a crime under 18 U.S.C. s. 1956 or 31 952 U.S.C. s. 5318, s. 5322, or s. 5324, regardless of adjudication. 953 (q)âHaving been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty 954 or nolo contendere to, misappropriation, conversion, or unlawful 955 withholding of moneys belonging to others, regardless of 956 adjudication. 957 (r)âHaving been convicted of, or entered a plea of guilty 958 or nolo contendere to, a violation of 31 C.F.R. chapter X, part 959 1022, regardless of adjudication. 960 (s)(r)âFailure to inform the office in writing within 30 961 days after having pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or being 962 convicted of, any felony or crime punishable by imprisonment of 963 1 year or more under the law of any state or the United States, 964 or any crime involving fraud, moral turpitude, or dishonest 965 dealing. 966 (t)(s)âAiding, assisting, procuring, advising, or abetting 967 any person in violating a provision of this chapter or any order 968 or rule of the office or commission. 969 (u)(t)âFailure to pay any fee, charge, or cost imposed or 970 assessed under this chapter. 971 (v)(u)âFailing to pay a fine assessed by the office within 972 30 days after the due date as stated in a final order. 973 (w)(v)âFailure to pay any judgment entered by any court 974 within 30 days after the judgment becomes final. 975 (x)(w)âEngaging or advertising engagement in the business 976 of a money services business or deferred presentment provider 977 without a license, unless exempted from licensure. 978 (y)(x)âPayment to the office for a license or other fee, 979 charge, cost, or fine with a check or electronic transmission of 980 funds that is dishonored by the applicantâs or licenseeâs 981 financial institution. 982 (z)(y)âViolations of 31 C.F.R. ss. 1010.306, 1010.311, 983 1010.312, 1010.340, 1010.410, 1010.415, 1022.210, 1022.320, 984 1022.380, and 1022.410, and United States Treasury Interpretive 985 Release 2004-1. 986 (aa)(z)âAny practice or conduct that creates the likelihood 987 of a material loss, insolvency, or dissipation of assets of a 988 money services business or otherwise materially prejudices the 989 interests of its customers. 990 (bb)(aa)âFailure of a check casher to maintain a federally 991 insured depository account as required by s. 560.309. 992 (cc)(bb)âFailure of a check casher to deposit into its own 993 federally insured depository account any payment instrument 994 cashed as required by s. 560.309. 995 (dd)(cc)âViolating any provision of the Military Lending 996 Act, 10 U.S.C. s. 987, or the regulations adopted under that act 997 in 32 C.F.R. part 232, in connection with a deferred presentment 998 transaction conducted under part IV of this chapter. 999 (ee)âFailure to comply with the notification requirements 1000 in s. 501.171(3) and (4). 1001 (2)âPursuant to s. 120.60(6), The office shall issue an 1002 emergency order suspending may summarily suspend the license of 1003 a money services business if the office finds that a licensee 1004 poses an immediate, serious danger to the public health, safety, 1005 and welfare. A proceeding in which the office seeks the issuance 1006 of a final order for the summary suspension of a licensee shall 1007 be conducted by the commissioner of the office, or his or her 1008 designee, who shall issue such order. The following acts are 1009 deemed by the Legislature to constitute an immediate and serious 1010 danger to the public health, safety, and welfare, and the office 1011 shall may immediately suspend the license of a money services 1012 business without making any further findings of immediate 1013 danger, necessity, and procedural fairness if: 1014 (a)âThe money services business fails to provide to the 1015 office, upon written request, any of the records required by s. 1016 560.123, s. 560.1235, s. 560.211, or s. 560.310 or any rule 1017 adopted under those sections. The suspension may be rescinded if 1018 the licensee submits the requested records to the office. 1019 (b)âThe money services business fails to maintain a 1020 federally insured depository account as required by s. 1021 560.208(4) or s. 560.309. 1022 (c)âA natural person required to be listed on the license 1023 application for a money services business pursuant to s. 1024 560.141(1)(a)3. is criminally charged with, or arrested for, a 1025 crime described in paragraph (1)(o), paragraph (1)(p), or 1026 paragraph(1)(q). 1027 Section 6.âSection 560.1311, Florida Statutes, is created 1028 to read: 1029 560.1311âInformation security programs; cybersecurity event 1030 investigations.â 1031 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1032 (a)ââCustomerâ means a person who seeks to obtain or who 1033 obtains or has obtained a financial product or service from a 1034 licensee. 1035 (b)ââCustomer informationâ means any record containing 1036 nonpublic personal information about a customer of a financial 1037 transaction, whether on paper, electronic, or in other forms, 1038 which is handled or maintained by or on behalf of the licensee 1039 or its affiliates. 1040 (c)ââCybersecurity eventâ means an event resulting in 1041 unauthorized access to, or disruption or misuse of, an 1042 information system, information stored on such information 1043 system, or customer information held in physical form. 1044 (d)ââFinancial product or serviceâ means any product or 1045 service offered by a licensee under this chapter. 1046 (e)ââInformation security programâ means the 1047 administrative, technical, or physical safeguards used to 1048 access, collect, distribute, process, protect, store, use, 1049 transmit, dispose of, or otherwise handle customer information. 1050 (f)ââInformation systemâ means a discrete set of electronic 1051 information resources organized for the collection, processing, 1052 maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or disposition of 1053 electronic information, as well as any specialized system such 1054 as an industrial process control system, telephone switching and 1055 private branch exchange system, or environmental control system, 1056 which contain customer information or which are connected to a 1057 system that contains customer information. 1058 (g)1.ââNonpublic personal informationâ means: 1059 a.âPersonally identifiable financial information; and 1060 b.âAny list, description, or other grouping of customers 1061 which is derived using any personally identifiable financial 1062 information that is not publicly available, such as account 1063 numbers, including any list of individualsâ names and street 1064 addresses which is derived, in whole or in part, using 1065 personally identifiable financial information that is not 1066 publicly available. 1067 2.âThe term does not include: 1068 a.âPublicly available information, except as included on a 1069 list, description, or other grouping of customers described in 1070 sub-subparagraph 1.b.; 1071 b.âAny list, description, or other grouping of consumers, 1072 or any publicly available information pertaining to such list, 1073 description, or other grouping of consumers, which is derived 1074 without using any personally identifiable financial information 1075 that is not publicly available; or 1076 c.âAny list of individualsâ names and addresses which 1077 contains only publicly available information, is not derived, in 1078 whole or in part, using personally identifiable financial 1079 information that is not publicly available, and is not disclosed 1080 in a manner that indicates that any of the individuals on the 1081 list is a customer of a licensee. 1082 3.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 1083 a.(I)ââPersonally identifiable financial informationâ means 1084 any information that: 1085 (A)âA customer provides to a licensee to obtain a financial 1086 product or service, such as information that a customer provides 1087 to a licensee on an application to obtain a loan or other 1088 financial product or service; 1089 (B)âA licensee receives about a consumer which is obtained 1090 during or as a result of any transaction involving a financial 1091 product or service between the licensee and the customer, such 1092 as information collected through an information-collecting 1093 device from a web server; or 1094 (C)âA licensee otherwise obtains about a customer in 1095 connection with providing a financial product or service to the 1096 customer, such as the fact that an individual is or has been one 1097 of the licenseeâs customers or has obtained a financial product 1098 or service from the licensee. 1099 (II)âThe term âpersonally identifiable financial 1100 informationâ does not include: 1101 (A)âA list of names and addresses of customers of an entity 1102 that is not a financial institution; or 1103 (B)âInformation that does not identify a customer, such as 1104 blind data or aggregate information that does not contain 1105 personal identifiers such as account numbers, names, or 1106 addresses. 1107 b.(I)ââPublicly available informationâ means any 1108 information that a licensee has a reasonable basis to believe is 1109 lawfully made available to the general public from: 1110 (A)âFederal, state, or local government records, such as 1111 government real estate records or security interest filings; 1112 (B)âWidely distributed media, such as information from a 1113 telephone records repository or directory, a television or radio 1114 program, a newspaper, a social media platform, or a website that 1115 is available to the general public on an unrestricted basis. A 1116 website is not restricted merely because an Internet service 1117 provider or a site operator requires a fee or a password, so 1118 long as access is available to the general public; or 1119 (C)âDisclosures to the general public which are required to 1120 be made by federal, state, or local law. 1121 (II)âAs used in this sub-subparagraph, the term âreasonable 1122 basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general 1123 publicâ relating to any information means that the person has 1124 taken steps to determine: 1125 (A)âThat the information is of the type that is available 1126 to the general public, such as information included on the 1127 public record in the jurisdiction where the mortgage would be 1128 recorded; and 1129 (B)âWhether an individual can direct that the information 1130 not be made available to the general public and, if so, the 1131 customer to whom the information relates has not done so, such 1132 as when a telephone number is listed in a telephone directory 1133 and the customer has informed the licensee that the telephone 1134 number is not unlisted. 1135 (h)ââThird-party service providerâ means a person, other 1136 than a licensee, which contracts with a licensee to maintain, 1137 process, or store nonpublic personal information, or is 1138 otherwise permitted access to nonpublic personal information 1139 through its provision of services to a licensee. 1140 (2)âINFORMATION SECURITY PROGRAM.â 1141 (a)âEach licensee shall develop, implement, and maintain a 1142 comprehensive written information security program that contains 1143 administrative, technical, and physical safeguards for the 1144 protection of the licenseeâs information system and nonpublic 1145 personal information. 1146 (b)âEach licensee shall ensure that the information 1147 security program meets all of the following criteria: 1148 1.âBe commensurate with the following measures: 1149 a.âSize and complexity of the licensee. 1150 b.âNature and scope of the licenseeâs activities, including 1151 the licenseeâs use of third-party service providers. 1152 c.âSensitivity of nonpublic personal information that is 1153 used by the licensee or that is in the licenseeâs possession, 1154 custody, or control. 1155 2.âBe designed to do all of the following: 1156 a.âProtect the security and confidentiality of nonpublic 1157 personal information and the security of the licenseeâs 1158 information system. 1159 b.âProtect against threats or hazards to the security or 1160 integrity of nonpublic personal information and the licenseeâs 1161 information system. 1162 c.âProtect against unauthorized access to or the use of 1163 nonpublic personal information and minimize the likelihood of 1164 harm to any customer. 1165 3.âDefine and periodically reevaluate the retention 1166 schedule and the mechanism for the destruction of nonpublic 1167 personal information if retention is no longer necessary for the 1168 licenseeâs business operations or is no longer required by 1169 applicable law. 1170 4.âRegularly test and monitor systems and procedures for 1171 the detection of actual and attempted attacks on, or intrusions 1172 into, the licenseeâs information system. 1173 5.âBe monitored, evaluated, and adjusted, as necessary, to 1174 meet all of the following requirements: 1175 a.âDetermine whether the licenseeâs information security 1176 program is consistent with relevant changes in technology. 1177 b.âConfirm the licenseeâs information security program 1178 accounts for the sensitivity of nonpublic personal information. 1179 c.âIdentify changes that may be necessary to the licenseeâs 1180 information system. 1181 d.âEliminate any internal or external threats to nonpublic 1182 personal information. 1183 e.âAmend the licenseeâs information security program for 1184 any of the licenseeâs changing business arrangements, including, 1185 but not limited to, mergers and acquisitions, alliances and 1186 joint ventures, and outsourcing arrangements. 1187 (c)1.âAs part of a licenseeâs information security program, 1188 the licensee shall establish a written incident response plan 1189 designed to promptly respond to, and recover from, a 1190 cybersecurity event that compromises: 1191 a.âThe confidentiality, integrity, or availability of 1192 nonpublic personal information in the licenseeâs possession; 1193 b.âThe licenseeâs information system; or 1194 c.âThe continuing functionality of any aspect of the 1195 licenseeâs operations. 1196 2.âThe written incident response plan must address all of 1197 the following: 1198 a.âThe licenseeâs internal process for responding to a 1199 cybersecurity event. 1200 b.âThe goals of the licenseeâs incident response plan. 1201 c.âThe assignment of clear roles, responsibilities, and 1202 levels of decisionmaking authority for the licenseeâs personnel 1203 that participate in the incident response plan. 1204 d.âExternal communications, internal communications, and 1205 information sharing related to a cybersecurity event. 1206 e.âThe identification of remediation requirements for 1207 weaknesses identified in information systems and associated 1208 controls. 1209 f.âThe documentation and reporting regarding cybersecurity 1210 events and related incident response activities. 1211 g.âThe evaluation and revision of the incident response 1212 plan, as appropriate, following a cybersecurity event. 1213 h.âThe process by which notice must be given as required 1214 under subsection (4) and s. 501.171(3) and (4). 1215 (d)1.âThis section does not apply to a licensee that has 1216 fewer than: 1217 a.âTwenty individuals on its workforce, including employees 1218 and independent contractors; or 1219 b.âFive hundred customers during a calendar year. 1220 2.âA licensee that no longer qualifies for exemption under 1221 subparagraph 1. has 180 calendar days to comply with this 1222 section after the date of the disqualification. 1223 (e)âEach licensee shall maintain a copy of the information 1224 security program for a minimum of 5 years and shall make it 1225 available to the office upon request or as part of an 1226 examination. 1227 (3)âCYBERSECURITY EVENT INVESTIGATION.â 1228 (a)âIf a licensee discovers that a cybersecurity event has 1229 occurred or that a cybersecurity event may have occurred, the 1230 licensee, or an outside vendor or third-party service provider 1231 that the licensee has designated to act on its behalf, shall 1232 conduct a prompt investigation of the cybersecurity event. 1233 (b)âDuring the investigation, the licensee, or the outside 1234 vendor or third-party service provider that the licensee has 1235 designated to act on its behalf, shall, at a minimum, determine 1236 as much of the following as possible: 1237 1.âConfirm that a cybersecurity event has occurred. 1238 2.âIdentify the date that the cybersecurity event first 1239 occurred. 1240 3.âAssess the nature and scope of the cybersecurity event. 1241 4.âIdentify all nonpublic personal information that may 1242 have been compromised by the cybersecurity event. 1243 5.âPerform or oversee reasonable measures to restore the 1244 security of any compromised information system in order to 1245 prevent further unauthorized acquisition, release, or use of 1246 nonpublic personal information that is in the licenseeâs, 1247 outside vendorâs, or third-party service providerâs possession, 1248 custody, or control. 1249 (c)âIf a licensee learns that a cybersecurity event has 1250 occurred, or may have occurred, in an information system 1251 maintained by a third-party service provider of the licensee, 1252 the licensee shall complete an investigation in compliance with 1253 this section or confirm and document that the third-party 1254 service provider has completed an investigation in compliance 1255 with this section. 1256 (d)âA licensee shall maintain all records and documentation 1257 related to the licenseeâs investigation of a cybersecurity event 1258 for a minimum of 5 years after the date of the cybersecurity 1259 event and shall produce the records and documentation to the 1260 office upon request. 1261 (4)âNOTICE TO OFFICE OF SECURITY BREACH.â 1262 (a)âEach licensee shall provide notice to the office of any 1263 breach of security affecting 500 or more individuals in this 1264 state at a time and in the manner prescribed by commission rule. 1265 (b)âEach licensee shall, upon the officeâs request, provide 1266 a quarterly update of a cybersecurity event investigation under 1267 subsection (3) until conclusion of the investigation. 1268 (5)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section may not be construed to 1269 relieve a covered entity from complying with s. 501.171. To the 1270 extent a licensee is a covered entity, as defined in s. 1271 501.171(1), the licensee remains subject to s. 501.171. 1272 (6)âRULES.âThe commission may adopt rules to administer 1273 this section, including rules that allow a licensee that is in 1274 full compliance with the Federal Trade Commissionâs Standards 1275 for Safeguarding Customer Information, 16 C.F.R. part 314, to be 1276 deemed in compliance with subsection (2). 1277 Section 7.âSection 655.0171, Florida Statutes, is created 1278 to read: 1279 655.0171âRequirements for customer data security and for 1280 notices of security breaches.â 1281 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1282 (a)ââBreach of securityâ or âbreachâ means unauthorized 1283 access of data in electronic form containing personal 1284 information. Good faith access of personal information by an 1285 employee or agent of a financial institution does not constitute 1286 a breach of security, provided that the information is not used 1287 for a purpose unrelated to the business or subject to further 1288 unauthorized use. As used in this paragraph, the term âdata in 1289 electronic formâ means any data stored electronically or 1290 digitally on any computer system or other database and includes 1291 recordable tapes and other mass storage devices. 1292 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Legal Affairs. 1293 (c)1.ââPersonal informationâ means: 1294 a.âAn individualâs first name, or first initial, and last 1295 name, in combination with any of the following data elements for 1296 that individual: 1297 (I)âA social security number; 1298 (II)âA driver license or identification card number, 1299 passport number, military identification number, or other 1300 similar number issued on a government document used to verify 1301 identity; 1302 (III)âA financial account number or credit or debit card 1303 number, in combination with any required security code, access 1304 code, or password that is necessary to permit access to the 1305 individualâs financial account; 1306 (IV)âThe individualâs biometric data as defined in s. 1307 501.702; or 1308 (V)âAny information regarding the individualâs geolocation; 1309 or 1310 b.âA username or e-mail address, in combination with a 1311 password or security question and answer that would permit 1312 access to an online account. 1313 2.âThe term does not include information about an 1314 individual which has been made publicly available by a federal, 1315 state, or local governmental entity. The term also does not 1316 include information that is encrypted, secured, or modified by 1317 any other method or technology that removes elements that 1318 personally identify an individual or that otherwise renders the 1319 information unusable. 1320 (2)âREQUIREMENTS FOR DATA SECURITY.âEach financial 1321 institution shall take reasonable measures to protect and secure 1322 data that are in electronic form and that contain personal 1323 information. 1324 (3)âNOTICE TO OFFICE AND DEPARTMENT OF SECURITY BREACH.â 1325 (a)1.âEach financial institution shall provide notice to 1326 the office of any breach of security affecting 500 or more 1327 individuals in this state. Such notice must be provided to the 1328 office as expeditiously as practicable, but no later than 30 1329 days after the determination of the breach or the determination 1330 of a reason to believe that a breach has occurred. 1331 2.âThe written notice to the office must include the items 1332 required under s. 501.171(3)(b). 1333 3.âA financial institution must provide the following 1334 information to the office upon its request: 1335 a.âA police report, incident report, or computer forensics 1336 report. 1337 b.âA copy of the policies in place regarding breaches. 1338 c. Steps that have been taken to rectify the breach. 1339 4.âA financial institution may provide the office with 1340 supplemental information regarding a breach at any time. 1341 (b)âEach financial institution shall provide notice to the 1342 department of any breach of security affecting 500 or more 1343 individuals in this state. Such notice must be provided to the 1344 department in accordance with s. 501.171. 1345 (4)âNOTICE TO INDIVIDUALS OF SECURITY BREACH.âEach 1346 financial institution shall give notice to each individual in 1347 this state whose personal information was, or the financial 1348 institution reasonably believes to have been, accessed as a 1349 result of the breach in accordance with s. 501.171(4). The 1350 notice must be provided no later than 30 days after the 1351 determination of the breach or the determination of a reason to 1352 believe that a breach has occurred. A financial institution may 1353 receive 15 additional days to provide notice to individuals of a 1354 security breach as required in this subsection if good cause for 1355 delay is provided in writing to the office within 30 days after 1356 determination of the breach or determination of the reason to 1357 believe that a breach has occurred. 1358 (5)âNOTICE TO CREDIT REPORTING AGENCIES.âIf a financial 1359 institution discovers circumstances requiring notice pursuant to 1360 this section of more than 1,000 individuals at a single time, 1361 the financial institution shall also notify, without 1362 unreasonable delay, all consumer reporting agencies that compile 1363 and maintain files on consumers on a nationwide basis, as 1364 defined in the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. s. 1681a(p), 1365 of the timing, distribution, and content of the notices. 1366 Section 8.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 1367 655.045, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1368 655.045âExaminations, reports, and internal audits; 1369 penalty.â 1370 (1)âThe office shall conduct an examination of the 1371 condition of each state financial institution at least every 18 1372 months. The office may conduct more frequent examinations based 1373 upon the risk profile of the financial institution, prior 1374 examination results, or significant changes in the institution 1375 or its operations. The office may use continuous, phase, or 1376 other flexible scheduling examination methods for very large or 1377 complex state financial institutions and financial institutions 1378 owned or controlled by a multi-financial institution holding 1379 company. The office shall consider examination guidelines from 1380 federal regulatory agencies in order to facilitate, coordinate, 1381 and standardize examination processes. 1382 (d)âAs used in this section, the term âcostsâ means the 1383 salary and travel expenses directly attributable to the field 1384 staff examining the state financial institution, subsidiary, or 1385 service corporation, and the travel expenses of any supervisory 1386 staff required as a result of examination findings. The mailing 1387 of any costs incurred under this subsection must be postmarked 1388 within 45 30 days after the date of receipt of a notice stating 1389 that such costs are due. The office may levy a late payment of 1390 up to $100 per day or part thereof that a payment is overdue, 1391 unless excused for good cause. However, for intentional late 1392 payment of costs, the office may levy an administrative fine of 1393 up to $1,000 per day for each day the payment is overdue. 1394 Section 9.âSubsection (2) of section 657.005, Florida 1395 Statutes, is amended to read: 1396 657.005âApplication for authority to organize a credit 1397 union; investigation.â 1398 (2)âAny five or more individuals, a majority of whom are 1399 residents of this state and all of whom who represent a limited 1400 field of membership, may apply to the office for permission to 1401 organize a credit union. The fact that individuals within the 1402 proposed limited field of membership have credit union services 1403 available to them through another limited field of membership 1404 shall not preclude the granting of a certificate of 1405 authorization to engage in the business of a credit union. 1406 Section 10.âSubsection (1) of section 657.024, Florida 1407 Statutes, is amended to read: 1408 657.024âMembership meetings.â 1409 (1)âThe members shall receive timely notice of the annual 1410 meeting and any special meetings of the members, which shall be 1411 held at the time, place, and in the manner provided in the 1412 bylaws. The annual meeting and any special meetings of the 1413 members may be held virtually and without a quorum, subject to 1414 the bylaws. 1415 Section 11.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) and present 1416 subsection (5) of section 657.042, Florida Statutes, are amended 1417 to read: 1418 657.042âInvestment powers and limitations.âA credit union 1419 may invest its funds subject to the following definitions, 1420 restrictions, and limitations: 1421 (3)âINVESTMENT SUBJECT TO LIMITATION OF TWO PERCENT OF 1422 CAPITAL OF THE CREDIT UNION.â 1423 (b)âCommercial paper and bonds of any corporation within 1424 the United States which have a fixed maturity, as provided in 1425 subsection (6) (7), except that the total investment in all such 1426 paper and bonds may not exceed 10 percent of the capital of the 1427 credit union. 1428 (5)âINVESTMENTS IN REAL ESTATE AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE CREDIT 1429 UNION.â 1430 (a)âUp to 5 percent of the capital of the credit union may 1431 be invested in real estate and improvements thereon, furniture, 1432 fixtures, and equipment utilized or to be utilized by the credit 1433 union for the transaction of business. 1434 (b)âThe limitations provided by this subsection may be 1435 exceeded with the prior written approval of the office. The 1436 office shall grant such approval if it is satisfied that: 1437 1.âThe proposed investment is necessary. 1438 2.âThe amount thereof is commensurate with the size and 1439 needs of the credit union. 1440 3.âThe investment will be beneficial to the members. 1441 4.âA reasonable plan is developed to reduce the investment 1442 to statutory limits. 1443 Section 12.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (4) of 1444 section 658.21, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1445 658.21âApproval of application; findings required.âThe 1446 office shall approve the application if it finds that: 1447 (4) 1448 (b)âAt least two of the proposed directors who are not also 1449 proposed officers must have had within the 10 years before the 1450 date of the application at least 1 year of direct experience as 1451 an executive officer, regulator, or director of a financial 1452 institution as specified in the application within the 5 years 1453 before the date of the application. However, if the applicant 1454 demonstrates that at least one of the proposed directors has 1455 very substantial experience as an executive officer, director, 1456 or regulator of a financial institution more than 5 years before 1457 the date of the application, the office may modify the 1458 requirement and allow the applicant to have only one director 1459 who has direct financial institution experience within the last 1460 5 years. 1461 (c)âThe proposed president or chief executive officer must 1462 have had at least 1 year of direct experience as an executive 1463 officer, director, or regulator of a financial institution 1464 within the last 10 5 years. In making a decision, the office 1465 must also consider may waive this requirement after considering: 1466 1.âThe adequacy of the overall experience and expertise of 1467 the proposed president or chief executive officer; 1468 2.âThe likelihood of successful operation of the proposed 1469 state bank or trust company pursuant to subsection (1); 1470 3.âThe adequacy of the proposed capitalization under 1471 subsection (2); 1472 4.âThe proposed capital structure under subsection (3); 1473 5.âThe experience of the other proposed officers and 1474 directors; and 1475 6.âAny other relevant data or information. 1476 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 658.33, Florida 1477 Statutes, is amended to read: 1478 658.33âDirectors, number, qualifications; officers.â 1479 (2)âNot less than a majority of the directors must, during 1480 their whole term of service, be citizens of the United States, 1481 and at least a majority of the directors must have resided in 1482 this state for at least 1 year preceding their election and must 1483 be residents therein during their continuance in office. In the 1484 case of a bank or trust company with total assets of less than 1485 $150 million, at least one, and in the case of a bank or trust 1486 company with total assets of $150 million or more, two of the 1487 directors who are not also officers of the bank or trust company 1488 must have had at least 1 year of direct experience as an 1489 executive officer, regulator, or director of a financial 1490 institution within the last 10 5 years. 1491 Section 14.âSubsection (4) of section 662.141, Florida 1492 Statutes, is amended to read: 1493 662.141âExamination, investigations, and fees.âThe office 1494 may conduct an examination or investigation of a licensed family 1495 trust company at any time it deems necessary to determine 1496 whether the licensed family trust company or licensed family 1497 trust company-affiliated party thereof has violated or is about 1498 to violate any provision of this chapter, any applicable 1499 provision of the financial institutions codes, or any rule 1500 adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter or the codes. 1501 The office may conduct an examination or investigation of a 1502 family trust company or foreign licensed family trust company at 1503 any time it deems necessary to determine whether the family 1504 trust company or foreign licensed family trust company has 1505 engaged in any act prohibited under s. 662.131 or s. 662.134 1506 and, if a family trust company or a foreign licensed family 1507 trust company has engaged in such act, to determine whether any 1508 applicable provision of the financial institutions codes has 1509 been violated. 1510 (4)âFor each examination of the books and records of a 1511 family trust company, licensed family trust company, or foreign 1512 licensed family trust company as authorized under this chapter, 1513 the trust company shall pay a fee for the costs of the 1514 examination by the office. As used in this section, the term 1515 âcostsâ means the salary and travel expenses of field staff 1516 which are directly attributable to the examination of the trust 1517 company and the travel expenses of any supervisory and support 1518 staff required as a result of examination findings. The mailing 1519 of payment for costs incurred must be postmarked within 45 30 1520 days after the receipt of a notice stating that the costs are 1521 due. The office may levy a late payment of up to $100 per day or 1522 part thereof that a payment is overdue unless waived for good 1523 cause. However, if the late payment of costs is intentional, the 1524 office may levy an administrative fine of up to $1,000 per day 1525 for each day the payment is overdue. 1526 Section 15.âSubsection (21) of section 517.12, Florida 1527 Statutes, is amended to read: 1528 517.12âRegistration of dealers, associated persons, 1529 intermediaries, and investment advisers.â 1530 (21)âThe registration requirements of this section do not 1531 apply to any general lines insurance agent or life insurance 1532 agent licensed under chapter 626, with regard to the sale of a 1533 security as defined in s. 517.021(34)(g) s. 517.021(33)(g), if 1534 the individual is directly authorized by the issuer to offer or 1535 sell the security on behalf of the issuer and the issuer is a 1536 federally chartered savings bank subject to regulation by the 1537 Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation. Actions under this 1538 subsection constitute activity under the insurance agentâs 1539 license for purposes of ss. 626.611 and 626.621. 1540 Section 16.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.